Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202658-713
Department of Economic Development; contract with agent.

(1) The Department of Economic Development may contract with a statewide public or private nonprofit organization or a state instrumentality which shall serve as agent for the department to help carry out the purposes and requirements of the Nebraska Affordable Housing Act.

(2) If the department utilizes an agent pursuant to this section, then any reference to the department in relationship to duties under the Nebraska Affordable Housing Act shall include such agent to the extent that the agreement between the department and the agent so specifies.

Laws 2026, LB768, § 8.
July 18, 2026